Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.265

Compensation of members of part-time boards and commissions—Class five groups (as amended by 2011 c 5).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class five group for purposes of compensation.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for working that day.

(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605, chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class five groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible((, and)). Meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial management, except for facilities provided free of charge.

(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class five groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting formats that do not require travel.

[2011 c 5 s 906; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 146; 1999 c 366 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 5: See note following RCW 43.03.220.

PDFRCW 43.03.265

Compensation of members of part-time boards and commissions—Class five groups (as amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 21).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class five group for purposes of compensation.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for working that day.

(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.

(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) No person designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under RCW 43.03.049 ((605, chapter 3, Laws of 2010)). Class five groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one location only when necessary or required by law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial management.))

(5) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) Class five groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting formats that do not require travel.

[2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 59; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 146; 1999 c 366 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 43.03.265 was amended twice during the 2011 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.